California statutes. Labor Code
(b) Any employee who is discharged, threatened with discharge, demoted, suspended, or in any other manner discriminated against in the terms and conditions of employment by their employer because the employee has made a bona fide oral or written complaint to the division, other governmental agencies having statutory responsibility for or assisting the division with reference to employee safety or health, their employer, or their representative, of unsafe working conditions, or work practices, in their employment or place of employment, or has participated in an employer-employee occupational health and safety committee, shall
 be entitled to reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by the acts of the employer. Any employer who willfully refuses to rehire, promote, or otherwise restore an employee or former employee who has been determined to be eligible for rehiring or promotion by a grievance procedure, arbitration, or hearing authorized by law, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) An employer, or a person acting on behalf of the employer, shall not retaliate against an employee because the employee is a family member of a person who has, or is perceived to have, engaged in any acts protected by this section.

(d) For purposes of this section, “employer” or “a person acting on behalf of the employer” includes, but is not limited to, a client employer as defined in paragraph
 (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2810.3 and an employer listed in subdivision (b) of Section 6400.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 6303 or other law, as used in this section, “employee” includes a domestic work employee, except for a person who performs household domestic service that is publicly funded, including publicly funded household domestic service provided to a recipient, client, or beneficiary with a share of cost in that service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 288, Sec. 1.   (AB 2658)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6311.

No employee shall be laid off or discharged for refusing to perform work in the performance of which this code, including Section 6400, any occupational safety or health standard, or any safety order of the division or standards board will be violated, where the violation would create a real and apparent hazard to the employee or their fellow employees. Any employee who is laid off or discharged in violation of this section or is otherwise not paid because the employee refused to perform work in the performance of which this code, any occupational safety or health standard, or any safety order of the division or standards board will be violated and where the violation would create a real and apparent hazard to the employee
 or their fellow employees shall have a right of action for wages for the time the employee is without work as a result of the layoff or discharge. Notwithstanding Section 6303 or other law, as used in this section, “employee” includes a domestic work employee, except for a person who performs household domestic service that is publicly funded, including publicly funded household domestic service provided to a recipient, client, or beneficiary with a share of cost in that service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 288, Sec. 2.   (AB 2658)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6311.5.

(a) (1) Except as noted in paragraph (2), a person who, after receiving notice to evacuate or leave, willfully and knowingly directs an employee to remain in, or enter, an area closed due to a menace to the public health or safety as set forth in Section 409.5 of the Penal Code shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) This section shall not apply to persons authorized to close an area, or to enter an area that has been closed, pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 409.5 of the Penal Code. This exemption includes persons listed in subdivision (d) of Section 409.5 of the Penal Code.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 6303 or other law, as used in this section, the term “employee” includes a person employed for household domestic service, including a person who performs household domestic service that is publicly funded, including publicly funded household domestic service provided to a recipient, client, or other beneficiary with a share of cost in that service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 288, Sec. 3.   (AB 2658)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6312.

Any employee who believes that he or she has been discharged or otherwise discriminated against by any person in violation of Section 6310 or 6311 may file a complaint with the Labor Commissioner pursuant to Section 98.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1479, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

6313.

(a) The division shall investigate the causes of any employment accident that is fatal to one or more employees or that results in a serious injury or illness, or a serious exposure, unless it determines that an investigation is unnecessary. If the division determines that an investigation of an accident is unnecessary, it shall summarize the facts indicating that the accident need not be investigated and the means by which the facts were determined. The division shall establish guidelines for determining the circumstances under which an investigation of these accidents and exposures is unnecessary.

(b) The division may investigate the causes of any other industrial accident or occupational illness which occurs within the state in any employment or place of employment, or which directly or indirectly arises from or is connected with the maintenance or operation of the employment or place of employment, and shall issue any orders necessary to eliminate the causes and to prevent reoccurrence. The orders may not be admitted as evidence in any action for damages, or any proceeding to recover compensation, based on or arising out of injury or death caused by the accident or illness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 885, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6313.5.

The division, after consultation with the Contractors’ State License Board, shall transmit to the Contractors’ State License Board copies of any
 citations or other actions taken by the division against a contractor as defined in the Contractors’ State License Law (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 372, Sec. 4.   (SB 465)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6314.

(a) To make an investigation or inspection, the chief of the division and all qualified divisional inspectors and investigators authorized by him or her shall, upon presenting appropriate credentials to the employer, have free access to any place of employment to investigate and inspect during regular working hours, and at other reasonable times when necessary for the protection of safety and health, and within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner. The chief or his or her authorized representative may, during the course of any investigation or inspection, obtain any statistics, information, or any physical materials in the possession of the employer that are directly related to the purpose of the investigation or inspection, conduct any tests necessary to the investigation or inspection, and take photographs. Photographs taken by the division during the course of any investigation or inspection shall be considered to be confidential information pursuant to the provisions of Section 6322, and shall not be deemed to be public records for purposes of the California Public Records Act.

(b) If permission to investigate or inspect the place of employment is refused, or the facts or circumstances reasonably justify the failure to seek permission, the chief or his or her authorized representative may obtain an inspection warrant pursuant to the provisions of Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of the Code of Civil Procedure. Cause for the issuance of a warrant shall be deemed to exist if there has been an industrial accident, injury, or illness reported, if any complaint that violations of occupational safety and health standards exist at the place of employment has been received by the division, or if the place of employment to be inspected has been chosen on the basis of specific neutral criteria contained in a general administrative plan for the enforcement of this division.

(c) The chief and his or her authorized representatives may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, records, and physical materials, administer oaths, examine witnesses under oath, take verification or proof of written materials, and take depositions and affidavits for the purpose of carrying out the duties of the division.

(d) In the course of any investigation or inspection of an employer or place of employment by an authorized representative of the division, a representative of the employer and a representative authorized by his or her employees shall have an opportunity to accompany him or her on the tour of inspection. Any employee or employer, or their authorized representatives, shall have the right to discuss safety and health violations or safety and health problems with the inspector privately during the course of an investigation or inspection. Where there is no authorized employee representative, the chief or his or her authorized representatives shall consult with a reasonable number of employees concerning matters of health and safety of the place of employment.

(e) During any investigation of an industrial accident or occupational illness conducted by the division pursuant to the provisions of Section 6313, the chief or his or her authorized representative may issue an order to preserve physical materials or the accident site as they were at the time the accident or illness occurred if, in the opinion of the division, it is necessary to do so in order to determine the cause or causes of the accident or illness, and the evidence is in potential danger of being removed, altered, or tampered with. Under these circumstances, the division shall issue that order in a manner that will avoid, to the extent possible, any interference with normal business operations.

A conspicuous notice that an order has been issued shall be prepared by the division and shall be posted by the employer in the area or on the article to be preserved. The order shall be limited to the immediate area and the machines, devices, apparatus, or equipment directly associated with the accident or illness. 

Any person who knowingly violates an order issued by the division pursuant to this subdivision shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 998, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6314.1.

(a) The division shall establish a program for targeting employers in high hazardous industries with the highest incidence of preventable occupational injuries and illnesses and workers’ compensation losses. The employers shall be identified from any or all of the following data sources: the California Work Injury and Illness program, the Occupational Injuries and Illness Survey, the federal hazardous employers’ list, experience modification and other relevant data maintained and furnished by all rating organizations as defined in Section 11750.1 of the Insurance Code, histories of violations of Occupational Safety and Health Act standards, and any other source deemed to be appropriate that identifies injury and illness rates.

(b) The division shall establish procedures for ensuring that the highest hazardous employers in the most hazardous industries are inspected on a priority basis. The division may send a letter to the high hazard employers who are identified pursuant to this section informing them of their status and directing them to submit a plan, including the establishment of joint labor-management health and safety committees, within a time determined by the division for reducing their occupational injury and illness rates. Employers who submit plans that meet the requirements of the division may be placed on a secondary inspection schedule. Employers on that schedule shall be inspected on a random basis as determined by the division. Employers who do not submit plans meeting the requirements of the division within the time specified by the division shall be placed on the primary inspection list. Every employer on the primary inspection list shall be subject to an inspection. The division shall employ sufficient personnel to meet minimum federal targeted inspection standards.

(c) The division shall establish and maintain regional plans for allocating the division’s resources for the targeted inspection program in addition to the inspections required or authorized in Sections 6309, 6313, and 6320. Each regional plan shall focus on industries selected from the targeted inspection program as well as any other scheduled inspections that the division determines to be appropriate to the region, including the cleanup of hazardous waste sites. All targeted inspections shall be conducted on a priority basis, targeting the worst employers first.

(d) In order to maximize the impact of the regional plans, the division shall coordinate its education, training, and consulting services with the priorities established in the regional plans.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 121, Sec. 68.   Effective July 16, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

6314.5.

(a) Every inspection conducted by the division shall include an evaluation of the employer’s injury prevention program established pursuant to Section 6401.7. The division shall evaluate injury prevention programs using the criteria for substantial compliance determined by the standards board. The evaluation shall include interviews with a sample of employees and the members of any employer-employee occupational safety and health committee. In any inspection which includes work for which a permit is required pursuant to Section 6500 and for which a permit has been issued pursuant to Section 6502, the evaluation of the employer’s injury prevention program shall be limited to the implementation of the plan approved by the division in the issuance of the permit. Before any inspection is concluded, the division shall notify the employer of the services available from the department to assist the employer to establish, maintain, improve, and evaluate the employer’s injury prevention program.

(b) Inspections also shall include an evaluation of the following:

(1) The condition or conditions alleged in the complaint if the inspection is conducted pursuant to Section 6309.

(2) The condition or conditions involved in the accident if the inspection is conducted pursuant to Section 6313.

(3) The condition or conditions involving work for which a permit is required pursuant to Section 6500, for which notification of asbestos related work is required pursuant to Section 6501.5, or for which a report of use of a carcinogen is required pursuant to Section 9030.

(4) The condition or conditions related to significant safety or health hazards in the industries identified in the regional plans developed pursuant to Section 6314.1.

(5) The condition or conditions involved in abatement of previous violations, special orders, or action orders if the inspection is conducted pursuant to Section 6320.

(c) The scope of any inspection may be expanded beyond the evaluations specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) whenever, in the opinion of the division, a more complete inspection is warranted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1369, Sec. 5.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

6315.

(a) There is within the division a Bureau of Investigations. The bureau is responsible for directing accident investigations involving violations of standards, orders, special orders, or Section 25910 of the Health and Safety Code, in which there is a serious injury to five or more employees, death, or request for prosecution by a division representative. The bureau shall review inspection reports involving a serious violation where there have been serious injuries to one to four employees or a serious exposure, and may investigate those cases in which the bureau finds criminal violations may have occurred. The bureau is responsible for preparing cases for the purpose of prosecution, including evidence and findings.

(b) The division shall provide the bureau with all of the following:

(1) All initial accident reports.

(2) The division’s inspection report for any inspection involving a serious violation where there is a fatality, and the reports necessary for the bureau’s review required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(3) Any other documents in the possession of the division requested by the bureau for its review or investigation of any case or which the division determines will be helpful to the bureau in its investigation of the case.

(c) The supervisor of the bureau is the administrative chief of the bureau, and shall be an attorney.

(d) The bureau shall be staffed by as many attorneys and investigators as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. To the extent possible, the attorneys and investigators shall be experienced in criminal law.

(e) The supervisor of the bureau and bureau representatives designated by the supervisor have a right of access to all places of employment necessary to the investigation, may collect any evidence or samples they deem necessary to an investigation, and have all of the powers enumerated in Section 6314.

(f) The supervisor of the bureau and bureau representatives designated by the supervisor may serve all processes and notices throughout the state.

(g) In any case where the bureau is required to conduct an investigation, and in which there is a serious injury or death, the results of the investigation shall be referred in a timely manner by the bureau to the appropriate prosecuting authority having jurisdiction for appropriate action, unless the bureau determines that there is legally insufficient evidence of a violation of the law. If the bureau determines that there is legally insufficient evidence of a violation of the law, the bureau shall notify the appropriate prosecuting authority, if the prosecuting authority requests notice.

(h) The bureau may communicate with the appropriate prosecuting authority at any time the bureau deems appropriate.

(i) Upon the request of a county district attorney, the department may develop a protocol for the referral of cases that may involve criminal conduct to the appropriate prosecuting authority in lieu of or in cooperation with an investigation by the bureau. The protocol shall provide for the voluntary acceptance of referrals after a review of the case by the prosecuting authority. In cases accepted for investigation by the prosecuting authority, the protocol shall provide for cooperation between the prosecuting authority, the division, and the bureau. Where a referral is declined by the prosecuting authority, the bureau shall comply with subdivisions (a) to (h), inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 884, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

6315.3.

The bureau shall, not later than February 15, annually submit to the division for submission to the director a report on the activities of the bureau, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Totals of each type of report provided the bureau under each category in subdivision (b) of Section 6315.

(b) Totals of each type of case reflecting the number of investigations and court cases in progress at the start of the calendar year being reported, investigations completed in the calendar year, cases referred to appropriate prosecuting authorities in the calendar year, and investigations and court cases in progress at the end of the calendar year. The types of cases shall include the following:

(1) Those that the bureau is required to investigate, divided into fatalities, serious injuries to five or more employees, and requests for prosecution from a division representative.

(2) Those that were initiated by the bureau following the review required in subdivision (a) of Section 6315, divided into serious injuries to fewer than five employees and serious exposures.

(c) A summary of the dispositions in the calendar year of cases referred by the bureau to appropriate prosecuting authorities. The summary shall be divided into the types of cases, as described in subdivision (b), and shall show at least the violation, the statute for which the case was referred for prosecution, and the dates of referral to the bureau for investigation, referral from the bureau for prosecution, and the final court action if the case was prosecuted.

(d) A summary of investigations completed in the calendar year that did not result in a referral for prosecution, divided into the types of cases as described in subdivision (b), showing the violation and the reasons for nonreferral.

(e) A summary of the use of the bureau’s resources in accomplishing the bureau’s mission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 493.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6315.5.

All occupational safety and health standards and orders, rules, regulations, findings, and decisions of the division made and entered pursuant to this part are admissible as evidence in any prosecution for the violation of any provision of this part, and shall, in every such prosecution, be presumed to be reasonable and lawful and to fix a reasonable and proper standard and requirement of safety unless, prior to the institution of the prosecution for such violation, proceedings for a hearing on a special order are instituted, or a petition is filed under Section 11426 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6316.

Except as limited by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 140) of Division 1, nothing in this part shall deprive the governing body of any county, city, or public corporation, board, or department, of any power or jurisdiction over or relative to any place of employment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6317.

(a) If, upon inspection or investigation, the division believes that an employer has violated Section 25910 of the Health and Safety Code, any standard, rule, order, or regulation established pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 140) of Division 1 of the Labor Code, or any standard, rule, order, or regulation established pursuant to this part, it shall with reasonable promptness issue a citation to the employer. Each citation shall be in writing and shall
 describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including a reference to the provision of the code, standard, rule, regulation, or order alleged to have been violated. In addition, the citation shall fix a reasonable time for the abatement of the alleged violation. The period specified for abatement shall not commence running until the date the citation or notice is received by certified mail and the certified mail receipt is signed, or if not signed, the date the return is made to the post office. If the division officially and directly delivers the citation or notice to the employer, the period specified for abatement shall commence running on the date of the delivery.

(b) (1) If an employer has multiple worksites and either of the following is true, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that a
 violation is enterprise-wide:

 (A) The employer has a written policy or procedure that violates Section 25910 of the Health and Safety Code, any standard, rule, order, or regulation established pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 140) of Division 1, or any standard, rule, order, or regulation established pursuant to this
 division. Such a written policy or procedure shall not form the basis for an enterprise-wide citation if it violates an emergency regulation adopted or amended within the last 30 days, commencing from the date of the vote of the standards board to adopt or amend the emergency regulation.

(B) The division has evidence of a pattern or practice of the same violation or violations committed by that employer involving more than one of the employer’s worksites.

(2) If the employer fails to rebut a
 presumption raised pursuant to paragraph (1), the division may issue an enterprise-wide citation requiring enterprise-wide abatement.

(3) Abatement pending appeal of an enterprise-wide citation shall be stayed only as permitted by Section 362 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, as that regulation existed as of January 1, 2021.

(4) This subdivision shall
 not apply to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the California Correctional Health Care Services, or the State Department of State Hospitals.

(c) (1) A “notice” in lieu of citation may be issued with respect to violations found in an inspection or investigation which meet either of the following requirements:

(A) The violations do not have a direct relationship upon the health or safety of an employee.

(B) The violations do not have an immediate relationship to the health or safety of an employee, and are of a general or regulatory nature. A notice in lieu of a citation may be issued only if the employer agrees to correct the violations within a reasonable time, as specified by
 the division, and agrees not to appeal the finding of the division that the violations exist. A notice issued pursuant to this paragraph shall have the same effect as a citation for purposes of establishing repeat violations or a failure to abate. Every notice shall clearly state the abatement period specified by the division, that the notice may not be appealed, and that the notice has the same effect as a citation for purposes of establishing a repeated violation or a failure to abate. The employer shall indicate agreement to the provisions and conditions of the notice by their signature on the notice.

(2) A notice shall not be issued in lieu of a citation if either of the following are true:

 (A) The violations are serious, repeated, willful, or arise from a failure to abate.

(B) The number of first instance violations found in the inspection, other than serious, willful, or repeated violations, is 10 or more violations. 

(3) The director shall prescribe guidelines for the issuance of these notices.

(d) The division may impose a civil penalty against an employer as specified in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6423) of this part.

(e) (1) A citation or notice shall not be issued by the division more than six months after the occurrence of the violation. For purposes of issuing a citation
 or notice for a violation of subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 6410, including any implementing related regulations, an “occurrence” continues until it is corrected, or the division discovers the violation, or the duty to comply with the violated requirement ceases to exist. Nothing in this subdivision is intended to alter the meaning of the term “occurrence” for violations of health and safety standards other than the recordkeeping requirements set forth in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 6410, including any implementing related regulations.

(2) The director shall prescribe procedures for the issuance of a citation or notice.

(f) The division shall prepare and maintain records capable of supplying an inspector with previous citations and notices issued to an
 employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 336, Sec. 1.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6317.5.

(a) If, upon inspection or investigation, the division finds that an employer has falsified any materials posted in the workplace or distributed to employees related to the California Occupational Safety and Health Act, the division shall issue a citation to the employer.

(b) Each citation issued pursuant to this section, or a copy or copies thereof, shall be prominently posted, as prescribed in regulations issued by the director.

(c) Any employer served with a citation pursuant to subdivision (a) may appeal to the appeals board pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6600). The appeal shall be subject to the timeframes and procedures set forth in that chapter.

(d) The provisions of this section are in addition to, and not in lieu of, all other criminal penalties and civil remedies that may be applicable to any act leading to issuance of a citation pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 580, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6317.7.

If, upon inspection or investigation, the division finds no violations pursuant to this chapter, the division with reasonable promptness shall issue a written notice to the employer specifying the areas inspected and stating that no violations were found.

The director shall prescribe procedures for the issuance of this notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 580, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6317.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, if, upon inspection or investigation, the division believes that an employer has willfully and egregiously violated an occupational safety or health standard, order, special order, or regulation, the division, with reasonable promptness, shall issue a citation to that employer for each egregious violation, and each instance of an employee exposed to that violation shall be considered a separate violation for purposes of the issuance of fines and penalties.

(b) For the purposes of this section, a violation is an “egregious violation” if one or more of the following is true about that employer or the willful violations committed by it:

(1) The employer, intentionally, through conscious, voluntary action or inaction, made no reasonable effort to eliminate the known violation.

(2) The violations resulted in worker fatalities, a worksite catastrophe, or a large number of injuries or illnesses. For purposes of this paragraph, “catastrophe” means the inpatient hospitalization, regardless of duration, of three or more employees resulting from an injury, illness, or exposure caused by a workplace hazard or condition.

(3) The violations resulted in persistently high rates of worker injuries or illnesses.

(4) The employer has
 an extensive history of prior violations of this part.

(5) The employer has intentionally disregarded their health and safety responsibilities.

(6) The employer’s conduct, taken as a whole, amounts to clear bad faith in the performance of their duties under this part.

(7) The employer has committed a large number of violations so as to undermine significantly the effectiveness of any safety and health program that may be in place.

(c) The conduct underlying a violation determined to be egregious shall have occurred within the five years preceding a citation for an egregious violation. Once a violation is determined to be egregious, that determination shall remain
 in effect for only five years. After that five-year period has elapsed, additional evidence as described in subdivision (b) shall be required to support any subsequent citation for an egregious violation.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), each employee exposed to a violation described in subdivision (a) shall not be considered a separate violation for purposes of a questionnaire described by Section 20101 of the Public Contract Code.

(e) This section shall not apply to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the California Correctional Health Care Services, or the State Department of State Hospitals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 336, Sec. 2.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6317.9.

In the investigation of the policies and practices of an employer or a related employer entity, the division may issue a subpoena if the employer or the related employer entity fails to promptly provide the requested information, and
 may enforce the subpoena if the employer or the related employer entity fails to provide the requested information within a reasonable period of time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 336, Sec. 3.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6318.

(a) Each citation issued under Section 6317, and each special order or action ordered pursuant to Section 6308, or a copy or copies thereof, shall be prominently posted, as prescribed in regulations issued by the director, at or near each place a violation referred to in the citation or order occurred. All postings shall be maintained for three working days, or until the unsafe condition is abated, whichever is longer. Following each investigation of an industrial accident or occupational illness, if no violations are found, the employer shall post a notice prepared by the division so indicating for three working days.

(b) When the division verifies abatement of a serious violation or an order at the time of inspection or upon
 reinspection, the employer shall post a notice prepared by the division so indicating for three working days. In all other cases of abatement of serious violations, the employer shall post the signed statement confirming abatement prepared pursuant to Section 6320.

(c) When a citation or special order or action is required to be posted pursuant to subdivision
 (a), the employer shall also post an employee notification prepared by the division. This employee notification shall contain, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Notice that the division investigated the workplace and found one or more workplace safety or health violations.

(2) Notice that the investigation resulted in one or more citations or orders, which the employer is required to post at or near the place of the violation for three working days, or until the unsafe condition is corrected, whichever is longer.

(3) Notice that the employer is required to communicate any hazards at the workplace to employees in a language and manner they understand.

(4) Contact information for the division and the internet website where employees can search for
 citations against their employer.

(d) The notification required by subdivision (c) shall be prominently posted by the employer at or near each place a violation referred to in the citation or order occurred. All postings shall be maintained for three working days, or until the unsafe condition is abated, whichever is longer.

(e) In addition to English, the employee notification required by subdivision (c) shall be made available by the division in the top seven non-English languages used by limited-English-proficient adults in California, as determined by the most recent American Community Survey by the United States Census Bureau. If Punjabi is not included among these languages, the division shall also make the employee notification available in Punjabi. The division may periodically review, evaluate, and add to the list of languages based on additional data sources, including,
 but not limited to, information generated by state and local government agencies, feedback from community-based organizations, labor organizations, and the division’s own data tracking measures.

(f) The division shall enforce this section by issuing a citation alleging a violation of this section and a notice of civil penalty in a manner consistent with Section 6317. Any person who receives a citation and penalty may appeal the citation and penalty to the appeals board in a manner consistent with Section 6319.

(g) This section does not preclude the division from promulgating additional posting requirements or other notifications to employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 2068)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6319.

(a) If, after an inspection or investigation, the division issues a citation pursuant to Section 6317 or an order pursuant to Section 6308, it shall, within a reasonable time after the termination of the inspection or investigation, notify the employer by certified mail of the citation or order, and that the employer has 15 working days from receipt of the notice within which to notify the appeals board that he or she wishes to contest the citation or order for any reason set forth in Section 6600 or 6600.5.

(b) An employer served by certified mail with a notice of civil penalty may appeal to the appeals board within 15 working days from receipt of that notice for any reason set forth in Section 6600. If the citation is
 issued for a violation involving the condition or operation of any machine, device, apparatus, or equipment, and a person other than the employer is obligated to the employer to repair the machine, device, apparatus, or equipment and to pay any penalties assessed against the employer, the other person may appeal to the appeals board within 15 working days of the receipt of the citation by the employer for any reasons set forth in Section 6600.

(c) The director shall promulgate regulations covering the assessment of civil penalties under this chapter which give due consideration to the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the following factors:

(1) The size of the business of the employer being charged.

(2) The gravity of the violation.

(3) The
 good faith of the employer, including timely abatement.

(4) The history of previous violations.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), if serious injury, illness, exposure, or death is caused by a serious, willful, or repeated violation, or by a failure to correct a serious violation within the time permitted for its correction, the penalty shall not be reduced for a reason other than the size of the business of the employer being charged. Whenever the division issues a citation for a violation covered by this subdivision, it shall notify the employer of its determination that serious injury, illness, exposure or death was caused by the violation and shall, upon request, provide the employer with a copy of the inspection report.

(e) The employer is not liable for a civil penalty under this part for any citation issued
 by a division representative providing consulting services pursuant to Sections 6354 and 6355.

(f) Whenever a citation of a self-insured employer for a willful or repeat serious violation of the standard adopted pursuant to Section 6401.7 becomes final, the division shall notify the director so that a hearing may be held to determine whether good cause exists to revoke the employer’s certificate of consent to self-insure as provided in Section 3702.

(g) Based upon the evidence, the division may propose appropriate modifications concerning the characterization of violations and corresponding modifications to civil penalties as a result thereof. For serious violations, the division shall not grant a proposed modification to civil penalties for abatement or credit for abatement unless the employer has done any of the following:

(1) Abated the violation at the time of the initial inspection.

(2) Abated the violation at the time of a subsequent inspection prior to the issuance of a citation.
